District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.03

Organization.

There is hereby established within DDOT the following offices and divisions:

(1)

The Office of the Director, consisting of the Offices of Human Resources and Legal Affairs with subordinate staff responsible for:

(A)

Technology and information services;

(B)

Contracting and procurement; and

(C)

Budget and financial services;

(2)

The Infrastructure Project Management Administration, with the following subordinate staff offices:

(A)

Project Management, to coordinate and manage:

(i)

Design and engineering; and

(ii)

Street and bridge construction project management;

(B)

Quality Control and Quality Assurance, to coordinate:

(i)

Material inspection;

(ii)

Material testing; and

(iii)

Project materials specification review;

(C)

Project Management Support, to coordinate and manage:

(i)

Construction project review and coordination;

(ii)

Construction contract execution;

(iii)

Design and engineering support; and

(iv)

Street and bridge construction support; and

(D)

Asset Management;

(3)

The Transportation Policy and Planning Administration, with the following coordinate subordinate staff offices:

(A)

Internodal Planning;

(B)

Financial Planning and Management;

(C)

Project Identification and Development;

(D)

Transportation System Data Management;

(E)

State Transportation Environmental Compliance; and

(F)

Mass Transit Policy, with functions to include supporting the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (“WMATA”) Board members and acting as a liaison between WMATA and the District government including on matters involving;

(i)

Alternative transportation; and

(ii)

School transit subsidy;

(4)

The Traffic Services Administration and the Office of Traffic Signal Systems to coordinate and manage:

(A)

Traffic operations and safety;

(B)

Intelligent transportation systems;

(C)

Transportation systems management; and

(D)

Concurrent with any other agency’s authority to do so, the enforcement of violations of motor vehicle parking offenses and the enforcement of violations of motor vehicle moving offenses;

(5)

The Rights-of-Way Management Administration, with subordinate staff to coordinate and manage:

(A)

Public space permits and records;

(B)

Investigations and inspections;

(C)

Bridge and street maintenance;

(D)

Traffic sign fabrication and installation; and

(E)

Advertisements on parking meters, including the back of receipts printed out by multi-space parking meters;

(6)

The Tree Management Administration, with the following subordinate staff offices:

(A)

Tree Planting; and

(B)

Tree Inventory Management.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 4, 49 DCR 3444
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 20(c), 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 77(b), 52 DCR 2638
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6032(a), 54 DCR 7052
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 6052(a), 57 DCR 6242

Short title: Section 6031 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle D of title VI of the act may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation Parking and Moving Offense Enforcement Authority Amendment Act of 2007”.

Short title: Section 6051 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle F of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Parking Meter Advertisement Amendment Act of 2010”.

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6052(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6032(a) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
D.C. Law 18-223, in par. (5), deleted “and” from the end of subpar. (C); inserted “and” at the end of subpar. (D), and added subpar. (E).
D.C. Law 17-20, in par. (4), deleted “and” from the end of subpar. (B), added “and” at the end of subpar. (C), and added subpar. (D).
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “DDOT” for “DOT”.
D.C. Law 15-105 deleted the subsection designation “(a)”; and in par. (5), validated a previously made technical correction.